Utah statutes.
76-10-1510.   Obstructing operation of bus -- Conspiracy.

Two or more persons who willfully combine or conspire to violate Section 76-10-1509 shall each be guilty of a class C misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 229, 2007 General Session

